wandat.lexc
!!!wandat.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +1P +2P +MASC +FEMZ +FEMI +In +Ex +Sg +Dl +Pl +FACT +FUT +OPT @P.MODAL.ON@ @D.MODAL@ @R.MODAL@ +PUNC +HAB +STAT +AGT +PAT +SEMI


LEXICON Root

PronPrefStart ;
ModalStart ;


LEXICON PronPrefStart

CStemPronPref ;
AStemPronPref ;


LEXICON ModalStart

@P.MODAL.ON@+FACT:@P.MODAL.ON@aʔ^ CStemPronPref;
@P.MODAL.ON@+FACT:@P.MODAL.ON@aʔ^ AStemPronPref;


LEXICON CStemPronPref

+1P+Sg+AGT:ye^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;
+2P+Sg+AGT:hše^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;
+MASC+Sg+AGT:ha^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;
+FEMZ+Sg+AGT:ya^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;
+FEMI+Sg+AGT:e^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;

+1P+Sg+PAT:waye^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;
+2P+Sg+PAT:sa^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;
+MASC+Sg+PAT:hu^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;
+FEMZ+Sg+PAT:u^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;
+FEMI+Sg+PAT:ayu^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;


LEXICON CStemAgentVerbStem

@R.MODAL@ⁿgyaha+PUNC:@R.MODAL@ⁿgyahaʔ #;
@D.MODAL@ⁿgyaha+HAB:@D.MODAL@ⁿgyahaš #;

@R.MODAL@ⁿdraw+PUNC:@R.MODAL@ⁿdrawaʔ #;
@D.MODAL@ⁿdraw+HAB:@D.MODAL@ⁿdrawahs #;

@R.MODAL@wahst+PUNC:@R.MODAL@wahstaʔ #;
@D.MODAL@wahst+STAT:@D.MODAL@wahstih #;


LEXICON CStemPatientVerbStem

@D.MODAL@ⁿgyaha+STAT:@D.MODAL@ⁿgyahay #;

@D.MODAL@ⁿdraw+STAT:@D.MODAL@ⁿdramęh #;

@D.MODAL@hšatur+STAT:@D.MODAL@hšaturhaʔ #;

LEXICON AStemPronPref

+1P+Sg+AGT:y^ AStemAgentStem ;
+2P+Sg+AGT:hš^ AStemAgentStem ;
+MASC+Sg+AGT:h^ AStemAgentStem ;
+FEMZ+Sg+AGT:w^ AStemAgentStem ;
+FEMI+Sg+AGT:ǫ^ AStemAgentStem ;

+1P+Sg+AGT:way^ AStemPatientStem ;
+2P+Sg+AGT:s^ AStemPatientStem ;
+MASC+Sg+AGT:hu^ AStemPatientStem ;
+FEMZ+Sg+AGT:ayu^ AStemPatientStem ;
+FEMI+Sg+AGT:u^ AStemPatientStem ;


LEXICON AStemAgentStem

+SEMI:at^ CStemAgentVerbStem ;

@R.MODAL@atǫmęht+PUNC:@R.MODAL@atǫmęht #;

@D.MODAL@ahskęnǫʔnyę+STAT:@D.MODAL@ahskęnǫʔnyęʔ #;

LEXICON AStemPatientStem

+SEMI:at^ CStemPatientVerbStem ;

@D.MODAL@atǫmęht+STAT:@D.MODAL@atǫmęhtih #;
